Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.090

Local jurisdictions reserved.

Local land use and zoning requirements, building setbacks, side and rear-yard requirements, site development, property line requirements, requirements adopted by counties or cities pursuant to chapter 58.17 RCW, snow load requirements, wind load requirements, and local fire zones are specifically reserved to local jurisdictions notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter.

[ 1989 c 266 s 5; 1974 ex.s. c 96 s 9.]